Utah statutes.
10-1-103.   Construction.

The powers herein delegated to any municipality shall be liberally construed to permit the municipality to exercise the powers granted by this act except in cases clearly contrary to the intent of the law.



Enacted by Chapter 48, 1977 General Session

